Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 5 Collateral Pool for Public Deposits Act of 1990
9-4-518. Reports of qualified public depositories.

Within fifteen (15) days after the end of each calendar month, or when requested by the state treasurer, each qualified public depository shall submit to the state treasurer a written report, under oath, indicating the average daily balance of all secured public deposits held by it during the month, the average monthly balance of all public deposits held for the previous twelve (12) calendar months, and any other information that the state treasurer determines necessary to administer this part.

In addition to the report required in subsection (a), each qualified public depository shall submit to the state treasurer:

If requested by the board or the state treasurer, a copy of the quarterly report of condition required by the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1817 et seq.), if such depository is a bank;

A schedule of financial information as determined by the board taken from the quarterly report on condition required by the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, if such depository is a bank;

If requested by the board or the state treasurer, a copy of the monthly and quarterly reports required to be filed with the office of thrift supervision, or such other federal regulator by whatever name called, if such depository is a savings institution; and

A schedule of financial information as determined by the board taken from the monthly and quarterly reports required to be filed with the office of thrift supervision, or such other federal regulator by whatever name called, if such depository is a savings institution.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), the following forms shall be made under oath:

The contingent liability agreement;

The depository pledge agreement; and

The public depository change of name, address and charter of institution.

Any information contained in a report by a qualified public depository required under this part or any rule adopted under this part, which is confidential by any law of the United States or of this state, shall be considered confidential and not subject to dissemination to anyone other than the state treasurer and the board under this part, and the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller of the treasury's designated representatives, for purposes of audit. The confidentiality of such information shall be maintained by the comptroller of the treasury in the same manner as the comptroller maintains the confidentiality of working papers which are not subject to § 10-7-503. It is the responsibility of each qualified public depository from which information is required to inform the state treasurer of information that is confidential, and the state treasurer does not have a duty to inquire into whether information is confidential.

Section 10-7-503 shall not apply to information deemed confidential as provided in subsection (d). All meetings of the board wherein such information is discussed shall be exempt from title 8, chapter 44.

Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1; 1991, ch. 438, § 1; 1997, ch. 217, § 5; 2003, ch. 38, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§9-4-501 —9-4-511 (Acts 1980, ch. 449, §§ 1-10, 12; T.C.A., §§9-5-401 —9-5-410,9-5-412; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 40; 1986, ch. 551, §§ 4-7; 1988, ch. 602, §§ 2-6), concerning an alternate method of securing the deposit of state funds, was repealed effective January 1, 1991 by Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1, which also enacted a new title 9, ch. 4, part 5 concerning a collateral pool for public deposits, effective January 1, 1991.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

9-4-519. Requirements for public depositors.

Public depositors shall comply with the following requirements:

A public depositor shall ensure that the name of the public depositor is on the account or certificate provided to the public depositor by the qualified public depository in a manner sufficient to disclose the identity of the public depositor; and

A public depositor who sustained a loss occasioned by a default or insolvency of a qualified public depository that was not satisfied pursuant to § 9-4-512 shall notify the state treasurer of that fact within three (3) business days after receiving actual notice of the default from publications made pursuant to § 9-4-513(a).

If a public depositor does not comply with subdivision (a)(1), the pool shall not be liable for the loss incurred to that particular account created by the public depositor. The waiver of immunity provided in § 9-4-520 shall be ineffective as to that public depositor for such account.

Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1; 1991, ch. 438, § 2; 1997, ch. 217, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§9-4-501 —9-4-511 (Acts 1980, ch. 449, §§ 1-10, 12; T.C.A., §§9-5-401 —9-5-410,9-5-412; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 40; 1986, ch. 551, §§ 4-7; 1988, ch. 602, §§ 2-6), concerning an alternate method of securing the deposit of state funds, was repealed effective January 1, 1991 by Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1, which also enacted a new title 9, ch. 4, part 5 concerning a collateral pool for public deposits, effective January 1, 1991.

9-4-520. State and public depositors not liable — Exception.

Under no circumstance is the state, or any state agency, or public depositor, liable for all or any portion of any loss resulting from the default or insolvency of a qualified public depository except as provided in §9-4-519(b).

Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§9-4-501 —9-4-511 (Acts 1980, ch. 449, §§ 1-10, 12; T.C.A., §§9-5-401 —9-5-410,9-5-412; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 40; 1986, ch. 551, §§ 4-7; 1988, ch. 602, §§ 2-6), concerning an alternate method of securing the deposit of state funds, was repealed effective January 1, 1991 by Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1, which also enacted a new title 9, ch. 4, part 5 concerning a collateral pool for public deposits, effective January 1, 1991.

9-4-521. [Reserved.]

Any fees collected under this part shall be paid into the treasury of the state, and the same are hereby appropriated exclusively to the department of the treasury to be used in carrying out this part.

Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§9-4-501 —9-4-511 (Acts 1980, ch. 449, §§ 1-10, 12; T.C.A., §§9-5-401 —9-5-410,9-5-412; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 40; 1986, ch. 551, §§ 4-7; 1988, ch. 602, §§ 2-6), concerning an alternate method of securing the deposit of state funds, was repealed effective January 1, 1991 by Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1, which also enacted a new title 9, ch. 4, part 5 concerning a collateral pool for public deposits, effective January 1, 1991.

9-4-523. State treasurer empowered to act as successor pledgee.

At such time as a public depository joins the collateral pool, the state treasurer is empowered to assume responsibility as successor pledgee of any and all collateral pledged on or after July 1, 1992, to individual public depositors by that public depository. The state treasurer is further empowered to assume responsibility as successor pledgee of any and all collateral pledged prior to July 1, 1992, to individual public depositors by such public depository, upon the written consent of the public depositors.

Upon assuming responsibility as successor pledgee as provided in subsection (a), the state treasurer is empowered to sign such documents on behalf of individual public depositors as may be required by a trustee custodian.

Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1; 1992, ch. 592, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5, §§9-4-501 —9-4-511 (Acts 1980, ch. 449, §§ 1-10, 12; T.C.A., §§9-5-401 —9-5-410,9-5-412; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 40; 1986, ch. 551, §§ 4-7; 1988, ch. 602, §§ 2-6), concerning an alternate method of securing the deposit of state funds, was repealed effective January 1, 1991 by Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 1, which also enacted a new title 9, ch. 4, part 5 concerning a collateral pool for public deposits, effective January 1, 1991.